Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.07
Sickness and accident insurance; term insured; construction.

The word insured, as used in sections 44-709 to 44-767, shall not be construed as preventing a person other than the insured with a proper insurable interest from making application for and owning a policy of sickness and accident insurance covering the insured or from being entitled under such a policy to any indemnities, benefits, and rights provided therein.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 8, p. 656;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 137.